California, session 20252026, AB222.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25302.9 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:25302.9. (a) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:(1) “Data center” means a room, or a portion of a room, in a building used primarily to house information technology equipment that serves a total information technology equipment load greater than 10 kilowatts and 20 watts per square foot of conditioned floor area.(2) “Power usage effectiveness” means a ratio of the total energy consumption of a data center to the energy specifically used by the information technology equipment housed in that data center.(b) (1) The commission shall establish a process for the owner of a data center to submit the power usage effectiveness ratio for the data center to the commission on a biannual basis.(2) The owner of a data center shall submit the power usage effectiveness ratio for the data center in a manner and timeframe specified by the commission.(c) As part of the 2027 edition of the integrated energy policy report required pursuant to Section 25302, the commission shall include an assessment of electrical load trends for data centers. This assessment shall include all of the following:(1) A projection of future load trends from data centers.(2) Identification of potential net peak load demands.(3) Recommendations for mitigating data center electricity consumption impacts on the electrical grid, including any recommended energy efficiency and demand response measures.(d) The commission may report data center energy consumption in an aggregate basis, but shall not disclose data center energy consumption information in a manner that would result in the disclosure of personally identifiable information or energy consumption data for a specific utility customer.SEC. 2. Section 913.18 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:913.18. (a) The commission shall assess the extent to which electrical corporation costs associated with new loads from data centers result in cost shifts to other electrical corporation customers. This assessment shall include all of the following:(1) An analysis of potential electrical corporation costs associated with procurement to meet growing load demands from data centers’ increased energy consumption.(2) An analysis of potential electrical corporation costs associated with the installation of new transmission and distribution assets to serve new data centers or expansions of existing data centers.(3) To the extent that the commission finds that electrical corporation costs to serve new loads from data centers will result in substantial cost shifts to other electrical corporation customers, the commission’s assessment shall also identify opportunities to prevent or mitigate these costs.(b) On or before January 1, 2027, the commission shall submit the assessment completed pursuant to this section to the relevant policy committees of the Legislature and publicly post a copy of the assessment on the commission’s internet website.(c) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2031.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 1 of this act, which adds Section 25302.9 to the Public Resources Code, imposes a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:In order to protect the confidential and proprietary information of an entity subject to Section 1 of this act, it is necessary that this act limit the public’s right of access to that information.